Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.555

Persons with annual half-time contracts—Eligibility for benefits under RCW 41.32.550.

Persons who were under an annual half-time contract with an employer anytime during the period of September 1, 1986, through August 31, 1987, shall be eligible for benefits provided by RCW 41.32.550, as amended by chapter 365, Laws of 1991, effective beginning the month following when they left service due to their disability if during that period they were medically determined to be permanently disabled for the performance of their duty.

A member who qualifies for benefits under this section who has not begun receiving benefits prior to June 11, 1992, shall be permitted to select a survivor option pursuant to RCW 41.32.530.

[ 1992 c 212 s 19; 1991 c 365 s 34.]

NOTES:

Severability—1991 c 365: See note following RCW 41.50.500.